Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1206.01
Emergency medical responder practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Emergency medical responder practice of emergency medical care means care provided in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for an emergency medical responder. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) contributing to the assessment of the health status of an individual, (2) simple, noninvasive interventions, and (3) minimizing secondary injury to an individual.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 12;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 19.